Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
When registering or updating the registration file of a sexually dangerous person, in addition to the requirements of subdivision (c)(1) or subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the sentencing court, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Arkansas State Hospital, the Department of Human Services, or the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain documentation of any treatment received for the mental abnormality or personality disorder of the sexually dangerous person.

Any sex offender working, enrolled, or volunteering in a public or private elementary, secondary or postsecondary school, or institution of training shall notify the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person of that status and shall register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over that campus.

(1)A sex offender required to register under this subchapter shall not change his or her name unless the change is:

Incident to a change in the marital status of the sex offender; or

Necessary to effect the exercise of the religion of the sex offender.

The change in the sex offender's name shall be reported to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person within five (5) calendar days after the change in name.

A violation of this subsection is a Class C felony.

(1)Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, a sex offender subject to lifetime registration under § 12-12-919 shall report in person every six (6) months after registration to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction to verify registration.

If the day a sex offender is scheduled to report under this section passes before the day a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction has determined as appropriate, the sex offender shall not be considered out of compliance if he or she reports at the next date set by the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

If a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction sets specific times and days for reporting then the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall have the appropriate staff available at those times and days for a sex offender to report under this section.

Name;

Social Security number;

Age;

Race;

Gender;

Date of birth;

Height;

Weight;

Hair and eye color;

Address of any permanent residence and address of any current temporary residence within this state or out of this state, including a rural route address and a post office box.

A post office box shall not be provided in lieu of a physical residential address;

Date and place of any employment or volunteer work;

Vehicle make, model, color, and license tag number that the sex offender owns, operates, or to which he or she has access;

Fingerprints.

If the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction cannot confirm that the sex offender's fingerprints are contained in the automated fingerprint identification system, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall:

Take the sex offender's fingerprints in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Submit the fingerprints to the center and to the Division of Arkansas State Police.

If the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction cannot confirm that the sex offender's palm prints are contained in the automated palm print identification system, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall:

Take the sex offender's palm prints in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Submit the palm prints to the center and to the Division of Arkansas State Police;

Photograph.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall take a photograph of the sex offender at each registration verification in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction and submit the photograph to the center;

All computers or other devices with internet capability to which the sex offender has access;

All email addresses used by the sex offender;

Passport.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any passport issued to the person by any country in the sex offender's name in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit the copy of any passport to the center;

Immigration documentation.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any immigration documents issued to the sex offender by any country in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit a copy of the documents to the center;

Professional licenses and permits.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any federal, state, or local professional license or permit issued to the sex offender in person at an office of the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit a copy of the documents to the center; and

All social media account information.

If the sex offender is enrolled or employed at an institution of higher education in this state, the sex offender shall also report in person to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction:

The name and address of each institution of higher education where he or she is enrolled or employed, including each campus attended;

The county where each campus is located; and

His or her enrollment or employment status.

If the place of residence of the sex offender is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, modular home, or manufactured home, the sex offender shall report in person the following information concerning the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, modular home, or manufactured home:

Vehicle identification number;

License tag number;

Registration number; and

A description, including color scheme.

If the place of residence of the sex offender is a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, the sex offender shall report in person the following information concerning the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat:

Hull identification number;

Manufacturer's serial number;

Name;

Registration number; and

A description, including color scheme.

If a person who is required to register as a sex offender owns an aircraft, the person shall provide in person the following information concerning the aircraft:

The aircraft registration number;

The manufacturer and model of the aircraft; and

A description of the color scheme of the aircraft.

(1)A sexually dangerous person subject to lifetime registration under § 12-12-919 shall report in person every ninety (90) days after registration to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction to verify registration.

If the day a sex offender is scheduled to report under this section passes before the day a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction has determined as appropriate, the sex offender shall not be considered out of compliance if he or she reports at the next date set by the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

If a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction sets specific times and days for reporting then the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall have the appropriate staff available at those times and days for a sex offender to report under this section.

Name;

Social Security number;

Age;

Race;

Gender;

Date of birth;

Height;

Weight;

Hair and eye color;

Address of any permanent residence and address of any current temporary residence within this state or out of this state, including a rural route address and a post office box.

A post office box shall not be provided in lieu of a physical residential address;

Date and place of any employment or volunteer work;

Vehicle make, model, color, and license tag number that the sexually dangerous person owns, operates, or to which he or she has access;

Fingerprints.

If the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction cannot confirm that the sexually dangerous person's fingerprints are contained in the automated fingerprint identification system, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall:

Take the sexually dangerous person's fingerprints in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Submit the fingerprints to the center and to the Division of Arkansas State Police.

If the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction cannot confirm that the sexually dangerous person's palm prints are contained in the automated palm print identification system, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall:

Take the sexually dangerous person's palm prints in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Submit the palm prints to the center and to the Division of Arkansas State Police;

Photograph.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall take a photograph of the sexually dangerous person at each registration verification in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction and submit the photograph to the center;

All computers or other devices with internet capability to which the sex offender has access;

All email addresses used by the sex offender;

Passport.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any passport issued to the sexually dangerous person by any country in the sexually dangerous person's name in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit the copy of any passport to the center;

Immigration documentation.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any immigration documents issued to the sexually dangerous person by any country in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit a copy of the documents to the center;

Professional licenses and permits.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall obtain a copy of any federal, state, or local professional license or permit issued to the sexually dangerous person in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at each registration verification and submit a copy of the documents to the center; and

All social media account information.

If the sexually dangerous person is enrolled or employed at an institution of higher education in this state, the sexually dangerous person shall also report in person to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction:

The name and address of each institution of higher education where he or she is enrolled or employed, including each campus attended;

The county where each campus is located; and

His or her enrollment or employment status.

If the place of residence of the sexually dangerous person is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, modular home, or manufactured home, the sexually dangerous person shall report in person the following information concerning the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, modular home, or manufactured home:

Vehicle identification number;

License tag number;

Registration number; and

A description, including color scheme.

If the place of residence of the sexually dangerous person is a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, the sexually dangerous person shall report in person the following information concerning the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat:

Hull identification number;

Manufacturer's serial number;

Name;

Registration number; and

A description, including color scheme.

If a sexually dangerous person who is required to register as a sexually dangerous person owns an aircraft, the sexually dangerous person shall report in person the following information concerning the aircraft:

The aircraft registration number;

The manufacturer and model of the aircraft; and

A description of the color scheme of the aircraft.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment of subdivision (a) by Acts 2001, No. 202, § 1 is deemed to be superseded by its amendment by Acts 2001, No. 1743, § 5. Acts 2001, No. 202, § 1 amended (a)(1) to read as follows:

“(a)(1)(A)At the time of an offender's adjudication of guilt, the sentencing court shall require the offender to complete the sex offender registration form in the format prepared by the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center pursuant to §12-12-908.

“(B)(1)For offenders who are sentenced to a term of incarceration in the Department of Correction, it shall be the responsibility of the Department of Correction to assure that those offenders complete the sex offender registration form.

“(2)For offenders who are adjudicated guilty but are not sentenced to a term of incarceration in the Department of Correction, it shall be the responsibility of the Department of Community Correction to assure that those offenders complete the sex offender registration form.”

Acts 2003, No. 1265 did not contain a Section 3.

As enacted, Acts 2011, No. 143, contained two sections designated as § 1.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “42 U.S.C. § 14071 et seq. and 64 Fed. Reg. 572 et seq., as they existed on March 1, 2003” for “64 Fed. Reg. 585 2d as it existed on March 1, 2003” in (a)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote this section.

The 2011 amendment by No. 143 deleted “beginning April 7, 2006” following “of this section” in (g)(1); inserted (O) through (Q) in (g)(3) and (h)(3); inserted “of higher education where he or she is enrolled or employed” in (g)(4)(A) and (h)(4)(A); and deleted “Beginning on March 21, 2007” at the beginning of (h)(1).

The 2011 amendment by No. 1009 added (a)(2)(C)(iii)(b) ; and added “within ninety (90) days from the date of registration” to the end of (a)(2)(C)(iii)(a) .

The 2013 amendment by No. 172 rewrote (a)(2)(A); inserted “or delinquent” in (a)(2)(B)(i); inserted “the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006” in (a)(2)(B)(ii); and rewrote (a)(2)(C)(i).

The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “dangerous person” or “dangerous person's” for “violent predator”throughout the section; substituted “Community Notification Assessment” for “SexOffender Screening and Risk Assessment” in (a)(1)(D)(i) and (a)(2)(C)(i).

The 2013 amendment by No. 508 inserted “palm prints” following “fingerprints” in (c)(1)(A)(iv) and added (g)(3)(M)(iii), (g)(3)(R)-(g)(3)(T) and (g)(7).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1129 substituted “ninety (90) days” for “three (3) months” in (h)(1); and, in (i), deleted “Within three (3) days” from the beginning and substituted “file the verification with the center in accordance with §12-12-909” for “report by written or electronic means all information obtained from or provided by the sex offender or sexually violent predator to the center.”

The 2015 amendment substituted “local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “center” in (c)(1)(A)(vii), (c)(2)(B), (c)(2)(C), and (c)(2)(E), and in (e) following “notify the”; substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (f)(1); substituted “local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center” in (f)(2); and added “or volunteer work” in (g)(3)(K) and (h)(3)(K).

The 2017 amendment inserted “in person” and “in-person” throughout the section except in (h)(1); substituted “in person” for “in writing” in (c)(1)(A)(vii), (c)(2)(B), and (c)(2)(E); inserted “in person at an office of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” throughout (g); redesignated former (g)(2) as (g)(2)(A); added (g)(2)(B); deleted former (g)(3)(Q); redesignated former (g)(3)(R)-(T) as (g)(3)(Q)-(S); added present (g)(3)(T); inserted “in person at an office of the law enforcement agency” throughout (h); redesignated former (h)(2) as (h)(2)(A); added (h)(2)(B); deleted former (h)(3)(Q); redesignated former (h)(3)(R)-(T) as (h)(3)(Q)-(S); added present (h)(3)(T); substituted “sexually dangerous person shall report in person” for “person shall provide” in (h)(7); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment by No. 262 substituted “five (5) calendar days” for “seven (7) calendar days” in (a)(2)(A); rewrote (c)(1) and (c)(2); and substituted “five (5) calendar days” for “ten (10) calendar days” in (f)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 587 added (a)(1)(A)(iii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”, “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”, and “Division of Arkansas State Police” for ”Department of Arkansas State Police” throughout the section.

U.S. Code. The Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-248, referred to in this section, is codified in part as 42 U.S.C. § 16901 et seq.

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statute Including “Sexually Motivated Offenses” Within Definition of Sex Offense for Purposes of Sentencing or Classification of Defendant as Sex Offender. 30 A.L.R.6th 373.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Imposing Criminal Penalties for Failure to Register as Required Under Sex Offender or Other Criminal Registration Statutes. 33 A.L.R.6th 91.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutory Requirement that Person Convicted of Sexual Offense in Other Jurisdiction Register or Be Classified as Sexual Offender in Forum State. 34 A.L.R.6th 171.

Validity of State Sex Offender Registration Laws Under Ex Post Facto Prohibitions. 63 A.L.R.6th 351.

Validity, Construction and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — General Principles, Evidentiary Matters, and Assistance of Counsel. 64 A.L.R.6th 1.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — Claims for Downward Departure. 66 A.L.R.6th 1.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — Claims Challenging Upward Departure. 67 A.L.R.6th 1.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Denial of postconviction relief under Ark. R. Crim. P. 37.1 was proper, because correction of the judgment to reflect the requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997 (SORA), §12-12-901 et seq., did not demonstrate error so fundamental as to render the judgment void and subject to collateral attack pursuant to Ark. R. Crim. P. 37.1; since the petitioner pled guilty to false imprisonment in the first degree of a minor victim, which was a designated crime at the time he was sentenced pursuant to §12-12-903(13)(A)(i)(r), he was subject to SORA requirements regardless of whether it was reflected on the original judgment.Justus v. State, 2012 Ark. 91 (2012).

Appellant failed to state a claim for habeas corpus relief, because the trial court was required by subsection (a) of this section to enter an amended judgment ordering him to register as a child or sexual offender when he entered a plea of guilty to false imprisonment, theft of property, and domestic battery committed in the presence of a child.Justus v. Hobbs, 2013 Ark. 149 (2013).

Defendant's conviction in the state of Washington required that he register as a sex offender, therefore, under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section, he was also required to register as a sex offender in Arkansas.Hammock v. State, 2009 Ark. App. 414, 322 S.W.3d 22 (2009).

Defendant was properly convicted of knowingly failing to register as a sex offender under 18 U.S.C. § 2250 because he was subject to the registration requirements under Haw. Rev. Stat. § 846E-2(a) upon his Hawaii sex offense conviction and he had a duty to re-register when he re-entered Arkansas pursuant to §12-12-905 and this section.United States v. Brewer, 628 F.3d 975 (8th Cir. 2010), cert. denied, 565 U.S. 829, 132 S. Ct. 126, 181 L. Ed. 2d 48 (2011).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for failing to register as a sex offender because defendant had been advised of his obligation to register, had been informed on how to register, and had been reporting for over 4 years. Despite defendant's excuses for failing to register after his release from jail, the State was not required to prove that defendant failed to register with any particular culpable mental state.Fleming v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 235 (2014).

Circuit court properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss related to his conviction under §12-12-904 for failure to comply with sex offender reporting requirements where defendant, who had been convicted of rape in 1993 and was imprisoned before the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997 was enacted, argued that the 1993 order did not impose a registration requirement, as required by this section. Defendant was found guilty of committing a registerable sex offense, he was in prison on August 1, 1997, which according to §12-12-905 and judicial interpretation, meant that the registration and verification requirements applied to him, and there was no legislative directive to apply the requirement in this section retroactively.Williams v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 526, 532 S.W.3d 614 (2017).

Sufficient evidence existed to support defendant's conviction for failing to register as a sex offender after he failed to verify his address. Defendant had been convicted of sex offenses requiring him to register in North Carolina, which under §12-12-903(13)(A)(iii) required him to register and verify his information in Arkansas; further, by signing an acknowledgement form that he was required to register, he had agreed to appear in person on a date certain to verify his information, but failed to do so.Martin v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 143, 545 S.W.3d 785 (2018).

Under §12-12-903(13)(A)(iii), once the State showed that defendant had been convicted of a sex offense requiring him to register as a sex offender in North Carolina, the State did not also have to show that the North Carolina offenses were similar to offenses requiring registration in Arkansas in order to support a conviction for failure to register; the statute reads in the disjunctive.Martin v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 143, 545 S.W.3d 785 (2018).

Circuit court did not err by denying defendant's motion to dismiss the state's petition to revoke the suspended sentence he received for failure to comply with the reporting requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, §12-12-901 et seq., because defendant did not receive an illegal sentence; by pleading guilty, defendant admitted that he was required to register as a sex offender under the Act by virtue of his conviction for rape in California, and that defendant could have asserted a defense to the charge did not call into question the circuit court's authority to preside over the criminal matter, to accept his plea of guilty, and to sentence appellant accordingly.Wicks v. State, 2010 Ark. App. 499, 375 S.W.3d 769 (2010).

Because the failure to register as a sex offender was a strict liability offense under §12-12-901 et seq. and the state proved that defendant was required to register but failed to do so, the trial court did not err by denying defendant's motion for a directed verdict.Adkins v. State, 371 Ark. 159, 264 S.W.3d 523 (2007).

After verifying the registration of a sex offender under subsection (g) of this section or a sexually dangerous person under subsection (h) of this section, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall file the verification with the center in accordance with § 12-12-909.

(1)Within three (3) days after registering or updating the registration file of a sex offender, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Department of Human Services, the sentencing court, or the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall report, by electronic means, all information obtained from the sex offender and regarding the sex offender to the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

(1)(A)No later than five (5) calendar days after release from incarceration or after the date of sentencing, a sex offender shall report in person to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction and update the information in the registration file.

If the sex offender is not already registered, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall register the sex offender in accordance with this subchapter.

Within three (3) days after registering a sex offender or receiving updated registry information on a sex offender, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall report, by electronic means, all information obtained from the sex offender to the center.

The center shall have access to the offender tracking systems of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction to confirm the location of registrants.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall verify the address of a sexually dangerous person on a quarterly basis and the address of all other sex offenders on a semiannual basis.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “a sexually dangerous person” for “sexually violent predators”in (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 508 substituted “National Sex Offender Public Registry” for “National Sex Offender Registry” in (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment substituted “local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “center” in (b)(3).

The 2017 amendment inserted “in person” in (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 262 deleted “written or” preceding “electronic” in (a)(1) and (b)(2); and substituted “five (5) calendar days” for “ten (10) days” in (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a)(1) and (b)(4).

Circuit court did not err in finding that defendant violated the terms and conditions of his suspended imposition of sentence by committing the new offense of failing to register as a sex offender after he was released from incarceration; although defendant objected to the Arkansas Crime Information Center documents when the documents were introduced, he did not raise the Confrontation Clause basis for objection until after the evidence had been introduced and the State had rested its case and therefore that argument was waived.Allen v. State, 2020 Ark. App. 84, 596 S.W.3d 518 (2020).

Because the failure to register as a sex offender was a strict liability offense under §12-12-901 et seq. and the state proved that defendant was required to register but failed to do so, the trial court did not err by denying defendant's motion for a directed verdict.Adkins v. State, 371 Ark. 159, 264 S.W.3d 523 (2007).

Cited: Fleming v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 235 (2014).

The Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall prepare the format for registration as required in subsection (b) of this section and shall provide instructions for registration to each organized full-time municipal police department, county sheriff's office, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Department of Human Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The registration file required by this subchapter shall include:

Address of any temporary residence;

Anticipated address of legal residence;

Driver's license number or state identification number, if available;

Social Security number;

Place of employment, education, or training;

Photograph, if not already obtained;

Fingerprints, if not already obtained;

Date of arrest, arresting agency, offense for which convicted or acquitted, and arrest tracking number for each adjudication of guilt or acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or defect;

A brief description of the crime or crimes for which registration is required;

The registration status of the sex offender as a sexually dangerous person, aggravated sex offender, or sex offender;

A statement in writing signed by the sex offender acknowledging that the sex offender has been advised of the duty to register imposed by this subchapter;

All computers or other devices with internet capability to which the sex offender has access;

All email addresses used by the sex offender;

Any other information that the center deems necessary, including without limitation:

Criminal and corrections records;

Nonprivileged personnel records;

Treatment and abuse registry records; and

Evidentiary genetic markers; and

All social media account information.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 989, § 7, subsection (a) began:

“Within sixty (60) days after August 1, 1997…”

As enacted, Acts 2011, No. 143, contained two sections designated as § 1.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted (b)(19) through (21) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and, in (c), inserted “email addresses, user names, screen names, or instant message names” and substituted “other similar information” for “the like”.

The 2013 amendment substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (b)(17).

The 2017 amendment deleted former (b)(21); redesignated former (b)(22) as (b)(21); and added present (b)(22).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

The Sex Offender Acknowledgement Form shall be uniform and created by the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall file the verification of registration electronically with the center through a system provided by the center.

If the sex offender changes his or her address without notice, notification shall be sent to law enforcement and supervising parole or probation authorities, and notice may be posted on the internet until proper reporting is again established or the sex offender is incarcerated.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section applies to a sex offender required to register as a sexually dangerous person, except that the sexually dangerous person shall verify the registration in person every ninety (90) days after the date of the initial release or commencement of parole.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section applies to a sex offender required to register under this subchapter who claims to be homeless except that a sex offender claiming to be homeless shall verify the registration in person every thirty (30) days during the period of time in which the sex offender is required to register under this subchapter and claims to be homeless.

(1)(A)Before a change of address within the state, a sex offender shall report the change of address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person no later than five (5) calendar days before the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled at the new address.

The sex offender shall report to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the new address in person within five (5) calendar days after relocating to the new address.

Upon receipt of a report of a change of address as described in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall report the change of address to the center.

Other than a change of address as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section, a sex offender shall report a change of any other information required to be reported at registration under § 12-12-908 or required to be reported at the time of verification under § 12-12-906 to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person within five (5) calendar days of the change.

When a change of address within the state is reported to the center, the center shall immediately report the change of address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the sex offender expects to reside.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment inserted “by certified mail” in (a)(1)(A)(i).

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a); added (b)(1)(B) (now (b)(1)(C)); substituted “local law enforcement having jurisdiction” for “the center” in (b)(1)(A); and, in (c)(1), substituted “sex offender” for “person” and “the sex offender” for “such person”.

The 2013 amendment substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (a)(5).

The 2015 amendment added (a)(6); inserted present (b)(1)(B); redesignated former (b)(1)(B) as (b)(1)(C); added (b)(1)(D); substituted “local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “center” in (c)(1); and, in (d), substituted “shall” for “may”, “any” for “a”, and “information” for “address”.

The 2017 amendment substituted “sex offender” for “person” and “person’s” throughout (a); in (a)(1), substituted “under this subchapter” for “as a sex offender” and inserted “in person”; in (a)(2)(A)(i), substituted “and” for “in which” preceding “a law enforcement officer” and inserted “the Sex Offender Acknowledgment Form”; deleted “certain” following “date” in (a)(2)(A)(ii); inserted “in person” in (a)(3)(D), (a)(5), and (a)(6); inserted the second occurrence of “sexually dangerous” in (a)(5); in (a)(6), substituted “under this subchapter” for “as a sex offender” twice and deleted “a person required to register as” following “homeless except that”; and inserted “in person” throughout (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment added “through a system provided by the center” in (a)(2)(C); deleted former (a)(3) through (a)(6) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “or fails to return the verification form if he or she is allowed to do so by mail” following “without notice” in (a)(3); substituted “five (5) calendar days” for “ten (10) days” in (b)(1)(A), (b)(1)(D), and (c)(1); substituted “five (5) calendar days” for “three (3) days” in (b)(1)(B); and substituted “residency” for “residence” in (c)(1).

This section requires sex offenders to report changes in employment 10 days before they occur and §12-12-904 provides sex offenders with an affirmative defense if they notify authorities no later than five days after changing employment; reading the two statutes together makes it clear that a defendant must notify authorities 10 days prior to changing employment, absent an affirmative defense, and since the loss of employment constitutes a change, §§12-12-904 and12-12-903 do not allow a 30-day grace period for reporting a change in employment. Mashburn v. State, 87 Ark. App. 89, 189 S.W.3d 73 (2004).

Cited: Fleming v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 235 (2014).

(1)Before a change of address to another state, a sex offender shall register the new address with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person and with a designated law enforcement agency in the state to which the sex offender moves in person not later than five (5) calendar days before the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled in the new state if the new state has a registration requirement.

The center shall require a sex offender to report any change of information through the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

The sentencing court shall assess at the time of sentencing a mandatory fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) on any person who is required to register under this subchapter.

(1)A person who relocates to this state and was convicted of an offense in another state that requires registration in this state shall pay a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) within ninety (90) days from the date of registration.

The person required to register has an affirmative defense to failure to pay a fee if he or she shows that his or her failure to pay the fee was not attributable to a:

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “Unless finding that undue hardship would result” at the beginning of (a).

The 2013 amendment inserted present (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (b)(1).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “may” for “shall” preceding “be issued”, deleted “it shall be the duty of” preceding “the local law”, substituted “shall” for “to” preceding “notify”, and inserted “or change of any other information required to be provided by the sex offender”; and inserted “or change of any other information required to be provided by the sex offender” in (c).

The 2017 amendment, in (c), inserted “the law enforcement officer has probably cause to believe that a sex offender has committed an offense under this subchapter” and “law enforcement” following “or the”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Purposeful refusal to obey the sentence of the court; or

Failure on the defendant's part to make a good faith effort to obtain the funds required for payment.

(1)The fine provided in subsection (a) of this section and collected in circuit court, district court, or city court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a form provided by that office for deposit into the Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund as established by § 12-12-911.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund”.

(1)This fund shall consist of special revenues collected pursuant to § 12-12-910, there to be used equally by the Arkansas Crime Information Center and the Division of Correction for the administration of this subchapter.

In order for a sex offender to be charged with the commission of a violation of this subchapter so that an arrest warrant may be issued, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall notify the prosecutor when the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction has reasonable grounds for believing that a sex offender is not registered, has not reported a change of address or change of any other information required to be provided by the sex offender, or has not verified the sex offender's address in violation of this subchapter.

The address of a sex offender as listed in the sex offender's registration file shall determine which local law enforcement agency has jurisdiction.

A law enforcement officer shall arrest a sex offender when a warrant has been issued for the sex offender's arrest, the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a sex offender has committed an offense under this subchapter, or the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds for believing that a sex offender is not registered or has not reported a change of address or change of any other information required to be provided by the sex offender in violation of this subchapter.

(1)Registration records maintained pursuant to this subchapter shall be open to any criminal justice agency in this state, the United States, or any other state.

In accordance with guidelines promulgated by the Sex Offender Assessment Committee, local law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction shall disclose relevant and necessary information regarding sex offenders to the public when the disclosure of such information is necessary for public protection.
